incubator/apertium-dar/dev/mehweb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>
%<prn%>
%<adv%>
%<num%>
%<det%>
%<np%>

%<asrt%>
%<emph%>

%<pers%>
%<resm%>

%<ant%>

%<m%>
%<f%>
%<nt%>

%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

%<sg%>
%<pl%>

%<erg%>
%<abs%>

%{и%}
%{т%}
%{б%}
%{а%}

%>
%+

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Miscellaneous ;
Pronouns ;
Determiners ;
Numerals ;
Nouns ; 
ProperNouns ;
Adverbs ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON K 

%+вал%<emph%>:%>вал # ; 
# ; 

LEXICON CASE 

%<abs%>: # ;
%<erg%>:%>ни # ;

LEXICON N-DUBURA 

%<n%>%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{т%} CASE ; 

LEXICON N-UQNA

%<n%>%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>р CASE ; 

LEXICON N-URŠI

%<n%>%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{б%}е CASE ; 

LEXICON N-ADAJ

%<n%>%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>хъалэ CASE ;

LEXICON N-UL

%<n%>%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>хъэ CASE ; ! FIXME: Check -э 

LEXICON N-KUNG

%<n%>%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{а%}не CASE ; 

LEXICON N-MAŠINKA

%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: # ; 
%<n%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ли%>ни # ; 

LEXICON N-UNCLASSIFIED 

%<n%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M 

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>:%>%{и%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-NU

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:у K ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:уни # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аб # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-ĦU

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:у K ;
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:уни # ;
!%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:аб # ;

LEXICON PRON-RESM-ČU

%<prn%>%<resm%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:с # ;

LEXICON NUM 

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<attr%>:%>ли # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM 

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous

гва%<asrt%>:гва # ; 

LEXICON Pronouns 

ну:н PRON-PERS-NU ; ! "я"
хӏу:хӏ PRON-PERS-ĦU ; ! "ты"

чу:чу PRON-RESM-ČU ; ! ""

LEXICON Determiners 

гьэш:гьэш DET-DEM ; ! ""

LEXICON Numerals 

цай:цай NUM ; ! ""

LEXICON Nouns 

дубура:дубура N-DUBURA ;  ! ""
бургьала:бургьала N-DUBURA ;  ! "" 
устар:устар N-DUBURA ;  ! ""
гӏабул:гӏабул N-DUBURA ; ! "лошадь"
ухъна:ухъна N-UQNA ; ! "старик"
адай:адай N-ADAJ ; ! "папа"
абай:абай N-ADAJ ; ! "мама"
замари:замари N-DUBURA ; 

ул:ул N-UL ; ! "ребёнок"

кунг:кунг N-KUNG ; ! "книга"

урши:урши N-URŠI ; ! "сын, мальчик"

машинка:машинка N-MAŠINKA ; ! ""

муцӏур:муцӏур N-UNCLASSIFIED ; ! ""

LEXICON ProperNouns 

ГӀали:ГӀали NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Махӏмуд:Махӏмуд NP-ANT-M ; ! ""

LEXICON Adverbs 

гьанна:гьанна ADV ; ! "сейчас"
